th: เครื่องหมายกำหนดจังหวะ: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; อื่นๆ
bg-BG: Времеви означения: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Други
ko: 박자표: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; 기타
sv: Tidsignaturer: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Övrigt
hr-HR: Vremenski potpisi: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Ostalo
tr: Zaman İmzaları: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Diğer
es: Firmas de tiempo: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Otros
nl: Maatsoorten: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Andere
pl: Sygnatury czasowe: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Inne
da: Tidssignaturer: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Andet
pt-PT: Tempo rítmico: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Outro
ru: Тактовый размер: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Другой
vi: Số chỉ nhịp: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Khác
ro-RO: Notațiile privind timpii: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Altele
de: Taktarten: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Sonstiges
it: Indicazioni di tempo: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Altro
sk-SK: Časové označenia: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Iné
nb: Tidssignaturer: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Annet
zh-TW: 拍號: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; 其他
fi: Tahtilajimerkinnät: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Muu
cs: Taktové předznamenání: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Jiné
el: Χρονοδείκτες: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Άλλο
hu: Ütemjelzés: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Egyéb
en: Time signatures: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Other
lt-LT: Metrai: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Kita
pt-BR: Tempo rítmico: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Outro
sl-SI: Časovni podpisi: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Drugo
zh-CN: 拍号: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; 其他
ja: 拍子記号: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; その他
fr: Signatures rythmiques: 12/8; 2/4; 3/4; 3/8; 4/4; 5/4; 6/4; 6/8; 7/4; 9/8; Autre